District of Columbia, session 26, B26-0784.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE COUNCIL OF THE DISTRICT OF COLUMBIA, That this
act may be cited as the “Comprehensive Policing and Justice Reform Technical Congressional
Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2026”.
Sec. 2. The Office of Citizen Complaint Review Establishment Act of 1998, effective
March 26, 1999 (D.C. Law 12-208; D.C. Official Code § 5-1101 et seq.), is amended as follows:
(a) Section 4 (D.C. Official Code § 5-1103) is amended by adding a new paragraph (3B)
to read as follows:
“(3B) “MPD” means the Metropolitan Police Department.”.


(b) Section 5(a) (D.C. Official Code § 5-1104(a)) is amended by striking the phrase “There
is established a Police Complaints Board (“Board”). The Board shall be composed of 5 members,
one of whom shall be a member of the MPD, and 4 of whom shall have no current affiliation with
any law enforcement agency.” and inserting the phrase “There is established a Police Complaints
Board. The Board shall be composed of 9 members, which shall include one member from each
Ward and one at-large member, none of whom, after the expiration of the term of the currently
serving member of the MPD, shall be affiliated with any law enforcement agency.” in its place.
(c) Section 8 (D.C. Official Code § 5-1107) is amended as follows:
(1) A new subsection (g-1) is added to read as follows:
“(g-1)(1) If the Executive Director discovers evidence of abuse or misuse of police powers
that was not alleged by the complainant in the complaint, the Executive Director may:
“(A) Initiate the Executive Director’s own complaint against the subject
police officer; and
“(B) Take any of the actions described in subsection (g)(2) through (6) of
this section.
“(2) The authority granted pursuant to paragraph (1) of this subsection shall include
circumstances in which the subject police officer failed to:
“(A) Intervene in or subsequently report any use of force incident in which
the subject police officer observed another law enforcement officer, including an MPD officer,
utilizing excessive force or engaging in any type of misconduct, pursuant to MPD General Order
901.07, its successor directive, or a similar local or federal directive; or


“(B) Immediately report to their supervisor any violations of the rules and
regulations of the MPD committed by any other MPD officer, and each instance of their use of
force or a use of force committed by another MPD officer, pursuant to MPD General Order 201.26,
or any successor directive.”.
(2) Subsection (h) is amended by striking the phrase “subsection (g)” and inserting
the phrase “subsection (g) or (g-1)” in its place.
Sec. 3. Chapter 3 of Title 14 of the District of Columbia Official Code is amended as
follows:
(a) Section 14-310(b)(4) is amended as follows:
(1) Subparagraph (B) is amended by striking the phrase “whom the victim has” and
inserting the phrase “whom a victim under 18 years of age has” in its place.
(2) Subparagraph (C) is amended by striking the phrase “the victim” and inserting
the phrase “a victim who is under 18 years of age” in its place.
(b) Section 14-311(b)(4) is amended as follows:
(1) Subparagraph (B) is amended by striking the phrase “with whom the victim
has” and inserting the phrase “with whom a victim under 18 years of age has” in its place.
(2) Subparagraph (C) is amended by striking the phrase “the victim” and inserting
the phrase “a victim who is under 18 years of age” in its place.
(c) Section 14-312(b)(5) is amended as follows:
(1) Subparagraph (B) is amended by striking the phrase “with whom the sexual
assault victim has” and inserting the phrase “with whom a sexual assault victim under 18 years of
age has” in its place.


(2) Subparagraph (C) is amended by striking the phrase “the sexual assault victim”
and inserting the phrase “a sexual assault victim who is under 18 years of age” in its place.
Sec. 4. Applicability.
(a) Section 2 shall expire on the applicability date of section 105 of the Comprehensive
Policing and Justice Reform Amendment Act of 2022, effective April 21, 2023 (D.C. Law 24-345;
70 DCR 7904).
(b) Section 3 shall expire on the applicability date of section 4 of the Leading Education
Access for Reentry and Necessary Success (“LEARNS”) Amendment Act of 2026, enacted on
July 2, 2026 (D.C. Act 26-368; 73 DCR 9419).
Sec. 5. Fiscal impact statement.
The Council adopts the fiscal impact statement of the Budget Director as the fiscal impact
statement required by section 4a of the General Legislative Procedures Act of 1975, approved
October 16, 2006 (120 Stat. 2038; D.C. Official Code § 1-301.47a).
Sec. 6. Effective date.
This act shall take effect following approval by the Mayor (or in the event of veto by the
Mayor, action by the Council to override the veto) and shall remain in effect for no longer than 90
days, as provided for emergency acts of the Council of the District of Columbia in section 412(a)
of the District of Columbia Home Rule Act, approved December 24, 1973 (87 Stat. 788; D.C.
Official Code § 1-204.12(a)).